Hawaii statutes.
§349-3 General functions, duties, and
powers of the director. The director shall have the following principal
functions, duties, and powers:

(1) Serve as the principal official in state
government solely responsible for the performance, development, and control of
programs, policies, and activities on behalf of elders;

(2) Oversee, supervise, and direct the performance by
the director's subordinates of activities in such areas as planning,
evaluation, and coordination of elder programs and development of a statewide
service delivery network;

(3) Assess the policies and practices of other
agencies impacting on elders and conduct advocacy efforts for elders;

(4) Advise the governor on new legislation, programs,
and policy initiatives and conduct such liaison as would be required to
implement them;

(5) Serve as a member of advisory boards and
regulatory panels of state agencies in such areas as income maintenance, public
employment, retirement systems, certification of health care facilities and
programs, social service and medical assistance, and housing and employment,
among others;

(6) Administer funds allocated for the executive
office on aging; and apply for, receive, and disburse grants and donations from
all sources for elder programs and services;

(7) Establish a clearinghouse for complaints of
persons regarding services to elders, or operations of state and county
agencies affecting elders, investigate the complaints, and refer the complaints
and the director's findings to the appropriate agency for corrective action;

(8) Adopt, amend, and repeal rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for the purposes of this chapter;

(9) Employ and retain such staff as may be necessary
for the purposes of this chapter, in conformity with chapter 76; and

(10) Contract for or grant such services as may be
necessary for the purposes of this chapter, including master contract with
other state agencies receiving federal and state funds for programs and
services for the aging, and purchase of service agreements with appropriate
agencies. [L 1976, c 217, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 67, §8; am L
2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next